Nebraska, session 109, LB552.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB552 LB552
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Appropriate governing board means the Board of Regents of the
University of Nebraska, the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State
Colleges, or the governing board of any community college in relation to
such board's respective public postsecondary educational institution;
(b) Diversity, equity, and inclusion office means an office,
division, or other unit of a public postsecondary educational institution
established for the purpose of:
(i) Influencing hiring or employment practices of the public
postsecondary educational institution with respect to race, sex, color,
ethnicity, gender identity, or sexual orientation other than through the
use of color-blind and sex-neutral hiring processes in accordance with
state and federal antidiscrimination laws;
(ii) Promoting differential treatment of or providing special
benefits to individuals on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, gender
identity, or sexual orientation;
(iii) Promoting policies or procedures designed or implemented in
reference to race, color, ethnicity, gender identity, or sexual
orientation, other than policies or procedures developed by an attorney
and approved in writing by the appropriate governing board for the sole
purpose of ensuring compliance with any applicable court order or state
or federal law; or
(iv) Conducting diversity, equity, and inclusion programs designed
or implemented in reference to race, color, ethnicity, gender identity,
or sexual orientation, other than programs developed by an attorney and
approved in writing by the appropriate governing board for the sole
purpose of ensuring compliance with any applicable court order or state
or federal law;
(c) Diversity, equity, and inclusion program means a program that
requires an employee of a public postsecondary educational institution to
participate in or attend a training, orientation, workshop, therapy
-2-

LB552 LB552
2025 2025
session, or similar activity that focuses on any of the following:
(i) Describing structures, systems, relations of power, privilege,
or subordination on the basis of race, sex, color, gender, ethnicity,
gender identity, or sexual orientation;
(ii) Describing methods to identify, dismantle, or oppose any such
structure, system, relation of power, privilege, or subordination;
(iii) Justifying differential treatment or benefit on the basis of
race, sex, color, gender, ethnicity, gender identity, or sexual
orientation; or
(iv) Advancing theories of unconscious or implicit bias, cultural
appropriation, allyship, transgenderism, microaggressions,
microinvalidation, group marginalization, anti-racism, systemic
oppression, ethnocentrism, structural racism or inequity, social justice,
intersectionality, neopronouns, inclusive language, heteronormativity,
disparate impact, gender identity or theory, racial or sexual privilege,
or any concept substantially related to any of these theories; and
(d) Public postsecondary educational institution means the
University of Nebraska, the state colleges, and the community colleges.
(2) A public postsecondary educational institution shall not, except
as required by federal law:
(a) Establish or maintain a diversity, equity, and inclusion office;
(b) Hire or assign an employee of the institution or contract with a
third party to perform the duties of a diversity, equity, and inclusion
office;
(c) Compel, require, induce, or solicit any person to provide a
statement related to diversity, equity, and inclusion or give
preferential consideration to any person based on the provision of a
statement related to diversity, equity, and inclusion;
(d) Give preference on the basis of race, sex, color, ethnicity,
gender identity, or sexual orientation to an applicant for employment, an
employee, or a participant in any function of the public postsecondary
-3-

LB552 LB552
2025 2025
educational institution;
(e) Require as a condition of enrolling at the public postsecondary
educational institution or performing any function of such institution,
any person to participate in a diversity, equity, and inclusion program;
or
(f) Spend public money on a diversity, equity, and inclusion program
or office.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or prohibit
a public postsecondary educational institution or an employee of such
institution from:
(a) Offering training on sexual harassment;
(b) Operating an office staffed by, or employing, licensed attorneys
and legal support staff whose sole purpose is ensuring compliance with
state or federal law or an applicable court order;
(c) For the purposes of applying for a grant or complying with the
terms of accreditation by an accrediting agency, submitting to the
grantor or accrediting agency a statement that:
(i) Highlights the public postsecondary educational institution's
work in supporting:
(A) First-generation college students;
(B) Low-income students; or
(C) Underserved student populations; or
(ii) Certifies compliance with state and federal antidiscrimination
laws;
(d) Collecting data on certain information related to student or
employee demographics;
(e) Completing scholarly research or creating art work related to
diversity, equity, and inclusion and the dissemination of that work;
(f) Allowing or approving an activity of a student organization
registered with or recognized by the public postsecondary educational
institution; or
-4-

LB552 LB552
2025 2025
(g) Allowing or approving a guest speaker or performer on a short-
term engagement at such public postsecondary educational institution.
(4) An employee of a public postsecondary educational institution
who is required to participate in a diversity, equity, and inclusion
program may bring an action against the public postsecondary educational
institution. If the employee demonstrates that the public postsecondary
educational institution violated this section, the employee is entitled
to injunctive relief.
-5-